Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-239
Cemeteries; establishment.

A city of the primary class may purchase, hold, and pay for, in the manner provided in sections 15-239 to 15-243, lands outside the corporate limits of such city for the purpose of burial and cemetery grounds and avenues leading thereto.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXIX, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 4449;

C.S.1922, § 3834;

C.S.1929, § 15-237;

R.S.1943, § 15-239;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 56.